Illinois, session 104th, SB1887.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Water Commission Act of 1985 is amended by 5changing Section 2 and by adding Sections 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 612, 13, 14, and 15 as follows: 7    (70 ILCS 3720/2)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 252)8    Sec. 2. The General Assembly hereby finds and declares 9that it is necessary and in the public interest to help assure 10a sufficient and economic supply of a source of water within 11those county wide areas of this State where, because of a 12growth in population and proximity to large urban centers, the 13health, safety and welfare of the residents is threatened by 14an ever increasing shortage of a continuing, available and 15adequate source and supply of water on an economically 16reasonable basis; however, it is not the intent of the General 17Assembly to interfere with the power of municipalities to 18provide for the retail distribution of water to their 19residents or the customers of their water systems. Therefore, 20in order to provide for a sufficient and economic supply of 21water to such areas, it is hereby declared to be the law of 22this State that:23    (a) With respect to any water commission constituted   SB1887- 2 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1pursuant to Division 135 of the Illinois Municipal Code or 2established by operation of law under Public Act 83-1123, as 3amended, which water commission includes municipalities which 4in the aggregate have within their corporate limits more than 550% of the population of a county (hereinafter referred to as a 6"home county"), and such county is contiguous to a county 7which has a population in excess of 1,000,000 inhabitants, the 8provisions of this Act shall apply. With respect to any such 9water commission (hereinafter referred to as a "county water 10commission"): 11        (i) the terms of all commissioners of such commission 12    holding office at the time a water commission becomes a 13    county water commission shall terminate 30 days after such 14    time and new commissioners shall be appointed as the 15    governing board of the county water commission as 16    hereinafter provided in subsection (c); and 17        (ii) the county water commission shall continue to be 18    a body corporate and politic, and shall bear the name of 19    the home county but shall be independent from and not a 20    part of the county government and shall itself be a 21    political subdivision and a unit of local government, and 22    upon appointment of the new commissioners as the governing 23    board of such water commission as provided in subsection 24    (c), such water commission shall remain responsible for 25    the full payment of, and shall by operation of law be 26    deemed to have assumed and shall pay when due all debts and   SB1887- 3 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1    obligations of the commission as the same is constituted 2    and as such debts and obligations existed on the date such 3    water commission becomes a county water commission and 4    such additional debts and obligations as are incurred by 5    such commission after such date and prior to the 6    appointment of the new commissioners as the governing 7    board of such commission, and further shall continue to 8    have and exercise all powers and functions and duties of a 9    water commission created pursuant to Division 135 of the 10    Illinois Municipal Code, as now or hereafter amended, and 11    the county water commission may rely on that Division, as 12    modified and supplemented by the provisions of this Act, 13    as lawful authority under which it may act.14    (b) Any county water commission shall have as its 15territory within its corporate limits, subject to taxation for 16its purposes, and subject to the powers and limitations as 17conferred by this Act, (i) all of the territory of the home 18county except that territory located within the corporate 19limits of excluded units as hereinafter defined and (ii) also 20all of the territory located outside the home county and 21included within the corporate limits of an included unit as 22hereinafter defined. As used in this Act, "excluded unit" 23means a unit of local government having a waterworks system 24and having within its corporate limits territory within the 25home county and which either, at the time any commission 26becomes a county water commission, receives, or has contracted   SB1887- 4 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1at such time for the receipt of, more than 25% of the water 2distributed by such unit's water system from a source outside 3of the home county, or a unit of local government that seeks a 4change in status as provided in this Section. As used in this 5Section, "included unit" means any unit of local government 6having a waterworks system and having within its corporate 7limits territory within the home county, which unit of local 8government is not an excluded unit. No other water commission 9shall be constituted under Division 135 of the Illinois 10Municipal Code in any home county after the effective date of 11this Act to provide water from any source located outside the 12home county. A unit of local government may switch its status 13from being an included unit to an excluded unit provided that 14(i) it has constructed a water treatment plant prior to 15December 31, 2006 to comply with United States Environmental 16Protection Agency regulations regarding radium; (ii) it 17notifies the commission in writing of its desire to become an 18excluded unit; and (iii) it no longer demands future service 19from the commission and shall not be reinstated as an included 20unit. In the event a unit of local government switches status, 21the water commission shall, from any legally available 22sources, transfer the sums collected from that unit of local 23government for the period of time beginning January 1, 2006 to 24the date that this tax is no longer assessed within the 25affected excluded unit. The transfer of funds authorized 26herein shall be made within 90 days of the effective date of   SB1887- 5 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1this amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly. Except as 2authorized by a county water commission, no home county or 3included unit shall enter into any new or renew or extend any 4existing contract, agreement or other arrangement for the 5acquisition or sale of water from any source located outside a 6home county; provided, however, that any included unit may 7contract for a supply of water in case of a temporary emergency 8from any other unit of local government or any entity. In the 9event that any included unit elects to serve retail customers 10outside its corporate boundaries and to establish rates and 11charges for such water in excess of those charged within its 12corporate boundaries, such rates and charges shall have a 13reasonable relationship to the actual cost of providing and 14delivering the water; this provision is declarative of 15existing law. It is declared to be the law of this State 16pursuant to paragraphs (g) and (h) of Section 6 of Article VII 17of the Illinois Constitution that in any home county, the 18provisions of this Act and Division 135 of the Illinois 19Municipal Code, as modified and supplemented by this Act and 20this amendatory Act of the 93rd General Assembly, constitute a 21limitation upon the power of any such county and upon all units 22of local government (except excluded units) within such 23county, including home rule units, limiting to such county, 24units of local government and home rule units the power to 25acquire, supply or distribute water or to establish any water 26commission for such purposes involving water from any source   SB1887- 6 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1located outside the home county in a manner other than as 2provided or permitted by this Act and Division 135, as 3modified and supplemented by this Act, and further constitute 4an exercise of exclusive State power with respect to the 5acquisition, supply and distribution of water from any source 6located outside the home county by any such county and by units 7of local government (except excluded units), including home 8rule units, within such county and with respect to the 9establishment for such purposes of any water commission 10therein, which power may not be exercised concurrently by any 11unit of local government or home rule unit. Upon the request of 12any included unit, a county water commission shall provide 13such included unit Lake Michigan water in an amount up to the 14then current Department of Transportation allocation of Lake 15Michigan water for such included unit.16    With respect to a water commission to which the provisions 17of subsection (a) apply, all uninhabited territory that is 18owned and solely occupied by such a commission and is located 19not within its home county but within a non-home rule 20municipality adjacent to its home county shall, 21notwithstanding any other provision of law, be disconnected 22from that municipality by operation of this Act on the 23effective date of this amendatory Act of 1991, and shall 24thereafter no longer be within the territory of the 25municipality for any purpose; except that for the purposes of 26any statute that requires contiguity of territory, the   SB1887- 7 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1territory of the water commission shall be disregarded and the 2municipality shall not be deemed to be noncontiguous by virtue 3of the disconnection of the water commission territory.4    (c) The governing body of any water commission to which 5the provisions of subsection (a) apply shall be a board of 6commissioners, each to be appointed within 30 days after the 7water commission becomes a county water commission to a term 8commencing on such date, as follows: 9        (i) one commissioner, who shall serve as chairman, who 10    shall be a resident of the home county, to be appointed by 11    the chairman of the county board of such county with the 12    advice and consent of the county board, provided that 13    following the expiration of the term or vacancy of the 14    current chairman serving on the effective date of this 15    amendatory Act of the 93rd General Assembly, any 16    subsequent appointment as chairman shall also be subject 17    to the advice and consent of the county water commission; 18        (ii) one commissioner from each county board district 19    within the home county, to be appointed by the chairman of 20    the county board of the home county with the advice and 21    consent of the county board; and 22        (iii) one commissioner from each county board district 23    within the home county, to be appointed by the majority 24    vote of the mayors of those included units which are 25    municipalities and which have the greatest percentage of 26    their respective populations residing within such county   SB1887- 8 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1    board district of the home county.2    The mayors of the respective county board districts shall 3meet for the purpose of making said respective appointments at 4a time and place designated by that mayor in each county board 5district of the included unit with the largest population 6voting for a commissioner upon not less than 10 days' written 7notice to each other mayor entitled to vote.8    The commissioners so appointed shall serve for a term of 6 9years, or until their successors have been appointed and have 10qualified in the same manner as the original appointments, 11except that at the first meeting of such commissioners, (A) 12the commissioners first appointed pursuant to paragraph (ii) 13of this subsection shall determine publicly by lot 1/3 of 14their number to serve for terms of 2 years, 1/3 of their number 15to serve for terms of 4 years and 1/3 of their number to serve 16for terms of 6 years, any odd number of commissioners so 17determined by dividing into thirds to serve 6 year terms, and 18(B) the commissioners first appointed pursuant to paragraph 19(iii) of this subsection shall determine publicly by lot 1/3 20of their number to serve for terms of 2 years, 1/3 of their 21number to serve for terms of 4 years and 1/3 of their number to 22serve for terms of 6 years, any odd number of commissioners so 23determined by dividing into thirds to serve 6 year terms. The 24commissioner first appointed pursuant to paragraph (i) of this 25subsection, who shall serve as chairman, shall serve for a 26term of 6 years. Any commissioner may be a member of the   SB1887- 9 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1governing board or an officer or employee of such county or any 2unit of local government within such county. A commissioner is 3eligible for reappointment upon the expiration of his term. A 4vacancy in the office of a commissioner shall be filled for the 5balance of the unexpired term by appointment and qualification 6as to residency in the same manner as the original appointment 7was made. Each commissioner shall receive the same 8compensation which shall not be more than $10,000 $600 per 9year, except that no such commissioner who is a member of the 10governing board or an officer or employee of such county or any 11unit of local government within such county may receive any 12compensation for serving as a commissioner. Each commissioner 13may be removed by the appointing authority for any cause for 14which any other county or municipal officer may be removed. 15The county water commission shall determine its own rules of 16proceeding. A quorum shall be a majority of the commissioners 17then in office. All ordinances or resolutions shall be passed 18by not less than a majority of a quorum. No commissioner or 19employee of the commission, no member of the county board or 20other official elected within such county, no mayor or 21president or other member of the corporate authorities of any 22unit of local government within such county, and no employee 23of such county or any such unit of local government, shall be 24interested directly or indirectly in any contract or job of 25work or materials, or the profits thereof, or services to be 26performed for or by the commission. A violation of any of the   SB1887- 10 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1foregoing provisions of this subsection is a Class C 2misdemeanor. A conviction is cause for the removal of a person 3from his office or employment.4    (d) Except as provided in subsection (g), subject to the 5referendum provided for in subsection (e), a county water 6commission may borrow money for corporate purposes on the 7credit of the commission, and issue general obligation bonds 8therefor, in such amounts and form and on such conditions as it 9shall prescribe, but shall not become indebted in any manner 10or for any purpose in an amount including existing 11indebtedness in the aggregate to exceed 5.75% of the aggregate 12value of the taxable property within the territorial 13boundaries of the county water commission, as equalized and 14assessed by the Department of Revenue and as most recently 15available at the time of the issue of said bonds. Before or at 16the time of incurring any indebtedness, except as provided in 17subsection (g), the commission shall provide for the 18collection of a direct annual tax, which shall be unlimited as 19to rate or amount, sufficient to pay the interest on such debt 20as it falls due and also to pay and discharge the principal 21thereof at maturity, which shall be within 40 years after the 22date of issue thereof. Such tax shall be levied upon and 23collected from all of the taxable property within the 24territory of the county water commission. Dissolution of the 25county water commission for any reason shall not relieve the 26taxable property within such territory of the county water   SB1887- 11 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1commission from liability for such tax. The clerk of the 2commission shall file a certified copy of the resolution or 3ordinance by which such bonds are authorized to be issued and 4such tax is levied with the County Clerk of each county in 5which any of the territory of the county water commission is 6located and such filing shall constitute, without the doing of 7any other act, full and complete authority for each such 8County Clerk to extend such tax for collection upon all the 9taxable property within the territory of the county water 10commission subject to such tax in each and every year required 11sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on such bonds, 12as aforesaid, without limit as to rate or amount, and shall be 13in addition to and in excess of all other taxes authorized to 14be levied by the commission or any included unit. The general 15obligation bonds shall be issued pursuant to an ordinance or 16resolution and may be issued in one or more series, and shall 17bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times and in 18any event not more than 40 years from the date thereof, be sold 19at such price at private or public sale as determined by a 20county water commission, bear interest at such rate or rates 21such that the net effective interest rate received upon the 22sale of such bonds does not exceed the maximum rate determined 23under Section 2 of the Bond Authorization Act, which rates may 24be fixed or variable, be in such denominations, be in such 25form, either coupon or registered, carry such conversion, 26registration, and exchange privileges, be executed in such   SB1887- 12 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1manner, be payable in such medium of payment at such place or 2places within or without the State of Illinois, be subject to 3such terms of redemption, and contain or be subject to such 4other terms as the ordinance or resolution may provide, and 5shall not be restricted by the provisions of any other terms of 6obligations of public agencies or private persons.7    (e) No issue of general obligation bonds by a county water 8commission (except bonds to refund an existing bonded 9indebtedness) shall be authorized unless the commission 10certifies the proposition of issuing such bonds to the proper 11election officials, who shall submit the proposition to the 12voters at an election in accordance with the general election 13law, and the proposition has been approved by a majority of 14those voting on the proposition.15    The proposition shall be in the form provided in Section 5 16or shall be substantially in the following form:17-------------18  Shall general obligation 19  bonds for the purpose of 20  (state purpose), in the           YES 21  sum of $....(insert amount),  ----------------------------- 22  be issued by the .........        NO 23  (insert corporate name of 24  the county water commission)? 25-------------------------------------------------------------26    (f) In order to carry out and perform its powers and   SB1887- 13 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1functions and duties under the provisions of this Act and 2Division 135 of the Illinois Municipal Code, as modified and 3supplemented by this Act, the governing body of any county 4water commission may by ordinance levy annually upon all 5taxable property within its territory a tax at a rate not to 6exceed .005% of the value of such property, as equalized or 7assessed by the Department of Revenue for the year in which the 8levy is made. In addition, any county water commission may by 9ordinance levy upon all taxable property within its territory, 10for one year only, an additional tax for such purposes at a 11rate not to exceed .20% of the value of such property, as 12equalized or assessed by the Department of Revenue for that 13year; provided, however, that such tax may not be levied more 14than once in any county water commission.15    (g) Any county water commission shall have the power to 16borrow money, subject to the indebtedness limitation provided 17in subsection (d), from the home county or included units, in 18such amounts and in such terms as agreed by the governing 19bodies of the commission and the home county or included 20units.21    (h) No county water commission constituted pursuant to the 22Act shall engage in the retail sale or distribution of water to 23residents or customers of any municipality.24    (i) Nothing in the Section requires any municipality to 25contract with a county water commission for a supply of water.26    (j) The State of Illinois recognizes that any such   SB1887- 14 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1contract for the supply of water executed by a unit of local 2government and a county water commission may contain terms and 3conditions intended by the parties thereto to be absolute 4conditions thereof. The State of Illinois also recognizes that 5persons may loan funds to a county water commission 6(including, without limitation, the purchase of revenue or 7general obligation bonds of such commission) in reliance upon 8the terms and conditions of any such contract for the supply of 9water. Therefore, the State of Illinois pledges and agrees to 10those parties and persons which make loans of funds to a county 11water commission that it will not impair or limit the power or 12ability of a county water commission or a unit of local 13government fully to carry out the financial obligations and 14obligation to furnish water pursuant to the terms of any 15contract for the supply of water entered into by such county 16water commission or unit of local government for the term of 17such contracts or loans. All other terms and conditions of 18such contracts and intergovernmental agreements shall be 19binding to the extent that they are not inconsistent with this 20amendatory Act of the 93rd General Assembly.21(Source: P.A. 95-114, eff. 1-1-08.) 22    (70 ILCS 3720/6 new)23    Sec. 6. As used in this Act:24    "Construction-manager-at-risk delivery method" means a 25delivery method in which the party proposing to be the   SB1887- 15 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1construction manager commits to be responsible for performance 2of certain preconstruction services and, if the parties reach 3agreement on key terms, becomes responsible for construction 4of the project.5    "Design-build delivery method" means a delivery system 6that provides responsibility within a single contract for the 7furnishing of architecture, engineering, land surveying, and 8related services as required and the labor, materials, 9equipment, and other construction services for the project.10    "Design-build contract" means a contract for a public 11project under this Division between a commission and a 12design-build entity to furnish architecture, infrastructure, 13engineering, land surveying, public art or interpretive 14exhibits, and related services, as required, and the labor, 15materials, equipment, and other construction services for the 16project.17    "Design-build entity" means any individual, sole 18proprietorship, firm, partnership, joint venture, corporation, 19professional corporation, or other entity that proposes to 20design and construct any public project under this Division.21    "Design professional" means any individual, sole 22proprietorship, firm, partnership, joint venture, corporation, 23professional corporation, or other entity that offers services 24under the Illinois Architecture Practice Act of 1989, the 25Professional Engineering Practice Act of 1989, the Structural 26Engineering Practice Act of 1989, or the Illinois Professional   SB1887- 16 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1Land Surveyor Act of 1989.2    "Evaluation criteria" means the requirements for the 3separate phases of the selection process as defined in this 4Division and may include the specialized experience, technical 5qualifications and competence, capacity to perform, past 6performance, experience with similar projects, assignment of 7personnel to the project, and other appropriate factors.8    "Proposal" means the offer to enter into a design-build 9contract as submitted by a design-build entity in accordance 10with this Division.11    "Request for proposal" means the document used by the 12commission to solicit proposals for a design-build contract.13    "Scope and performance criteria" means the requirements 14for the commission project, including, but not limited to, the 15intended usage, capacity, size, scope, quality and performance 16standards, life-cycle costs, and other programmatic criteria 17that are expressed in performance-oriented and quantifiable 18specifications and drawings that can be reasonably inferred 19and are suited to allow a design-build entity to develop a 20proposal.  21    (70 ILCS 3720/7 new)22    Sec. 7. Commission facilities. A waterworks system or a 23common source of supply of water, or both, purchased or 24constructed by the commission: (1) may be located within or 25without the corporate limits of any customer municipality; (2)   SB1887- 17 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1may include, or may consist of, without limitation, facilities 2for receiving, storing, and transmitting water from any source 3for supplying water to customer municipalities and other 4purchasers of water from the commission; and (3) may include, 5without limitation, facilities that are developed, acquired, 6constructed, extended, or improved by the commission that may, 7at any time, be owned by another unit of local government if 8the facilities will serve the waterworks system or provide a 9common source of supply of water for the commission. 10    (70 ILCS 3720/8 new)11    Sec. 8. Construction contracts.12    (a) All or any portion of a waterworks system or other 13public improvement of a commission, when the expense thereof 14will exceed the greater of (i) $25,000 or (ii) the amount of 15expense above which a work or public improvement by a 16municipality must be let to the lowest responsible bidder 17after advertising for bids under Section 8-9-1 of the Illinois 18Municipal Code, shall be constructed, maintained, or repaired 19either: (1) by a contract let to the lowest responsible bidder 20after advertising for bids, in the manner prescribed by the 21commission's bylaws, rules, and regulations and by the vote 22required as established in the water purchase and sale 23contract; or (2) without advertising for bids, if authorized 24by a vote of greater than a majority of all the commissioners 25as established in an intergovernmental agreement. The   SB1887- 18 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1commission's bylaws, rules, and regulations shall provide for 2an alternative procedure for emergency procurement if an 3emergency makes it impracticable to follow the procedures in 4this subsection.5    (b) A commission may use alternative project delivery 6methods if the commission determines it to be in the 7commission's best interest for a particular project. An 8alternative project delivery method may include, without 9limitation, design-build delivery methods or 10construction-manager-at-risk delivery methods. All notices for 11the procurement of goods, services, or work to be provided 12pursuant to an alternate delivery method shall include all 13requirements for the goods, services, or work to be procured. 14All awards of contracts or agreements for the procurement of 15goods, services, or work to be provided pursuant to an 16alternate delivery method shall be made on the basis of 17demonstrated competence and qualifications and with due regard 18for the principles of competitive selection. As part of an 19alternate project delivery procurement process, prior to 20submission of proposals, the commission may conduct meetings 21and exchange confidential information with proposers to 22promote understanding of the request for proposals, review 23alternative design concepts, or discuss other issues related 24to the procurement.25    (c) A commission may establish goals or requirements for 26the procurement of goods and services and for construction   SB1887- 19 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1contracts to promote and encourage the continuing economic 2development of (i) businesses that are owned and operated by 3minorities, women, persons with disabilities, or veterans; 4(ii) businesses that are located within the territory of one 5or more of the municipalities that are members of the 6commission; (iii) businesses that employ persons who reside in 7the territory of one or more of the municipalities that are 8members of the commission. A commission may also establish 9other goals or requirements that result in the award to a 10responsible bidder other than the lowest responsible bidder if 11the commission determines that the award is in the 12commission's best interests, notwithstanding the requirements 13of subsection (a). Goals or requirements that are set by a 14commission that result in a preference being applied to a 15bidder or proposer, who has met those goals or requirements, 16in a commission's process for awarding construction contracts 17and for the procurement of goods and services must comply with 18the constitutional standards applicable to the preferences.19    (d) A customer municipality may enter into a contract for 20any portion of a waterworks system or other public improvement 21of a commission pursuant to a contracting method that is 22consistent with the requirements applicable to the 23municipality and generally consistent with the principles in 24subsection (a) or (b). The commission may accept assignment of 25such a contract and of payment obligations under that 26contract.  SB1887- 20 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1    (e) In connection with a contract by a commission for the 2construction of all or any portion of a waterworks system or 3other public improvement of the commission for which the 4commission issues bonds, the commission must enter into a 5project labor agreement with the applicable local building 6trades council prior to the commencement of any and all 7construction, building, renovation, demolition, or any 8material change to the structure or land.  9    (70 ILCS 3720/9 new)10    Sec. 9. Solicitation of proposals.11    (a) A commission may enter into design-build contracts. In 12addition to the requirements set forth in its local 13ordinances, when the commission elects to use the design-build 14delivery method, it must issue a notice of intent to receive 15proposals for the project at least 14 days before issuing the 16request for the proposal. The commission must publish the 17advance notice online on its website. The commission may 18publish the notice in construction industry publications or 19post the notice on construction industry websites. A brief 20description of the proposed procurement must be included in 21the notice. The commission must provide a copy of the request 22for proposal to any party requesting a copy.23    (b) The request for proposal shall be prepared for each 24project and must contain, without limitation, the following 25information:  SB1887- 21 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1        (1) The name of the commission.2        (2) A preliminary schedule for the completion of the 3    contract.4        (3) The proposed budget for the project, the source of 5    funds, and the currently available funds at the time the 6    request for proposal is submitted.7        (4) Prequalification criteria for design-build 8    entities wishing to submit proposals. The Commission shall 9    include, at a minimum, its normal prequalification, 10    licensing, registration, and other requirements; however, 11    nothing precludes the use of additional prequalification 12    criteria by the commission.13        (5) Material requirements of the contract, including, 14    but not limited to, the proposed terms and conditions, 15    required performance and payment bonds, and insurance.16        (6) The performance criteria.17        (7) The evaluation criteria for each phase of the 18    solicitation. Price may not be used as a factor in the 19    evaluation of Phase I proposals.20        (8) The number of entities that will be considered for 21    the technical and cost evaluation phase.22    (c) The commission may include any other relevant 23information that it chooses to supply. The design-build entity 24shall be entitled to rely upon the accuracy of this 25documentation in the development of its proposal.26    (d) The date that proposals are due must be at least 21   SB1887- 22 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1calendar days after the date of the issuance of the request for 2proposal. If the cost of the project is estimated to exceed 3$12,000,000, then the proposal due date must be at least 28 4calendar days after the date of the issuance of the request for 5proposal. The commission shall include in the request for 6proposal a minimum of 30 days to develop the Phase II 7submissions after the selection of entities from the Phase I 8evaluation is completed. 9    (70 ILCS 3720/10 new)10    Sec. 10. Development of scope and performance criteria.11    (a) The commission shall develop, with the assistance of a 12licensed design professional or licensed professional 13engineer, a request for proposal, which shall include scope 14and performance criteria. The scope and performance criteria 15must be in sufficient detail and contain adequate information 16to reasonably apprise the qualified design-build entities of 17the commission's overall programmatic needs and goals, 18including criteria and preliminary design plans, general 19budget parameters, schedule, and delivery requirements.20    (b) Each request for proposal shall also include a 21description of the level of design to be provided in the 22proposals. This description must include the scope and type of 23renderings, drawings, and specifications that, at a minimum, 24will be required by the commission to be produced by the 25design-build entities.  SB1887- 23 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1    (c) The scope and performance criteria shall be prepared 2by a licensed professional engineer who is an employee of the 3commission, or the commission may contract with an independent 4licensed professional engineer or engineering firm selected 5under the Local Government Professional Services Selection Act 6to provide these services.7    (d) The design professional that prepares the scope and 8performance criteria is prohibited from participating in any 9design-build entity proposal for the project.10    (e) The design-build contract may be conditioned upon 11subsequent refinements in scope and price and may allow the 12commission to make modifications in the project scope without 13invalidating the design-build contract. 14    (70 ILCS 3720/11 new)15    Sec. 11. Procedures for selection.16    (a) The commission must use a 2-phase procedure for the 17selection of the successful design-build entity. Phase I of 18the procedure will evaluate and shortlist the design-build 19entities based on qualifications, and Phase II will evaluate 20the technical and cost proposals.21    (b) The commission shall include in the request for 22proposal the evaluating factors to be used in Phase I. These 23factors are in addition to any prequalification requirements 24of design-build entities that the commission has set forth. 25Each request for proposal shall establish the relative   SB1887- 24 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1importance assigned to each evaluation factor and subfactor, 2including any weighting of criteria to be employed by the 3commission. The commission must maintain a record of the 4evaluation scoring to be disclosed in event of a protest 5regarding the solicitation.6    The commission shall include the following criteria in 7every Phase I evaluation of design-build entities: (i) 8experience of personnel; (ii) successful experience with 9similar project types; (iii) financial capability; (iv) 10timeliness of past performance; (v) experience with similarly 11sized projects; (vi) successful reference checks of the firm; 12and (vii) commitment to assign personnel for the duration of 13the project and qualifications of the entity's consultants.14    The commission may include any additional relevant 15criteria in Phase I that it deems necessary for a proper 16qualification review. The commission may not consider any 17design-build entity for evaluation or award if the entity has 18any pecuniary interest in the project or has other 19relationships or circumstances, including, but not limited to, 20long-term leasehold, mutual performance, or development 21contracts with the commission, that may give the design-build 22entity a financial or tangible advantage over other 23design-build entities in the preparation, evaluation, or 24performance of the design-build contract or that create the 25appearance of impropriety.26    Upon completion of the qualifications evaluation, the   SB1887- 25 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1commission shall create a shortlist of the most highly 2qualified design-build entities. The commission, in its 3discretion, is not required to shortlist the maximum number of 4entities as identified for Phase II evaluation, provided that 5no less than 2 design-build entities nor more than 6 are 6selected to submit Phase II proposals. The commission shall 7notify the entities selected for the shortlist in writing. 8This notification shall commence the period for the 9preparation of the Phase II technical and cost evaluations. 10The commission must allow sufficient time for the shortlist 11entities to prepare their Phase II submittals considering the 12scope and detail requested by the commission.13    (c) The commission shall include in the request for 14proposal the evaluating factors to be used in the technical 15and cost submission components of Phase II. Each request for 16proposal shall establish, for both the technical and cost 17submission components of Phase II, the relative importance 18assigned to each evaluation factor and subfactor, including 19any weighting of criteria to be employed by the commission. 20The commission must maintain a record of the evaluation 21scoring to be disclosed in event of a protest regarding the 22solicitation.23    The commission shall include the following criteria in 24every Phase II technical evaluation of design-build entities: 25(i) compliance with objectives of the project; (ii) compliance 26of proposed services to the request for proposal requirements;   SB1887- 26 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1(iii) quality of products or materials proposed; (iv) quality 2of design parameters; (v) design concepts; (vi) innovation in 3meeting the scope and performance criteria; and (vii) 4constructability of the proposed project. The commission may 5include any additional relevant technical evaluation factors 6it deems necessary for proper selection.7    The commission shall include the following criteria in 8every Phase II cost evaluation: the total project cost; the 9construction costs; and the time of completion. The commission 10may include any additional relevant technical evaluation 11factors it deems necessary for proper selection. The total 12project cost criteria weighting factor shall not exceed 30%.13    The commission shall directly employ or retain a licensed 14professional engineer to evaluate the technical and cost 15submissions to determine if the technical submissions are in 16accordance with generally accepted industry standards.17    Upon completion of the technical submissions and cost 18submissions evaluation, the commission may award the 19design-build contract to the highest overall ranked entity.  20    (70 ILCS 3720/12 new)21    Sec. 12. Small projects. In any case where the total 22overall cost of the project is estimated to be less than 23$12,000,000, the commission may combine the 2-phase procedure 24for selection described in Section 10 into one combined 25procedure, provided that all the requirements of evaluation   SB1887- 27 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1are performed in accordance with Section 11. 2    (70 ILCS 3720/13 new)3    Sec. 13. Submission of proposals.4    (a) Proposals must be properly identified and sealed. 5Proposals may not be reviewed until after the deadline for 6submission has passed as set forth in the request for 7proposals. All design-build entities submitting proposals 8shall be disclosed after the deadline for submission, and all 9design-build entities who are selected for Phase II evaluation 10shall also be disclosed at the time of that determination.11    (b) Proposals shall include a bid bond in the form and 12security as designated in the request for proposals. Proposals 13shall also contain a separate sealed envelope with the cost 14information within the overall proposal submission. Proposals 15shall include a list of all design professionals and other 16entities to which any work may be subcontracted during the 17performance of the contract.18    (c) Proposals must meet all material requirements of the 19request for proposal or they may be rejected as 20non-responsive. The commission has the right to reject any and 21all proposals.22    (d) The drawings and specifications of the proposal may 23remain the property of the design-build entity.24    (e) The commission shall review the proposals for 25compliance with the performance criteria and evaluation   SB1887- 28 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1factors.2    (f) Proposals may be withdrawn prior to evaluation for any 3cause. After evaluation begins by the commission, clear and 4convincing evidence of error is required for withdrawal. 5    (70 ILCS 3720/14 new)6    Sec. 14. Award; performance. The commission may award the 7contract to the highest overall ranked entity. Notice of award 8shall be made in writing. Unsuccessful entities shall also be 9notified in writing. The commission may not request a best and 10final offer after the receipt of proposals. The commission may 11negotiate with the selected design-build entity after award 12but prior to contract execution for the purpose of securing 13better terms than originally proposed, provided that the 14salient features of the request for proposal are not 15diminished.16A design-build entity and associated design professionals 17shall conduct themselves in accordance with the relevant laws 18of this State and the related provisions of the Illinois 19Administrative Code. 20    (70 ILCS 3720/15 new)21    Sec. 15. Applicability. Sections 8 through 14 of this Act 22shall apply notwithstanding anything to the contrary in 23Division 135 of Article 11 of the Municipal Code.   SB1887- 29 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1    Section 10. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 2changing Section 11-135-8 as follows: 3    (65 ILCS 5/11-135-8)  (from Ch. 24, par. 11-135-8)4    Sec. 11-135-8. Such commission shall have the right to 5supply water to any municipality, political subdivision, 6private person or corporation, in addition to the 7municipalities which have formed the commission, and to 8construct water transmission and distribution lines within a 9radius of 50 25 miles outside the corporate limits of member 10municipalities for the purpose of furnishing water to any 11additional entities which contract with the commission for a 12supply of water, upon such payment, terms and conditions as 13may be mutually agreed upon. In addition to the foregoing 14powers, if there is any municipality within a radius of 50 25 15miles of the corporate limits of the commission which desires 16not to own or operate a waterworks system, and such 17municipality adopts an ordinance requesting the Commission to 18supply water for public and domestic use within such 19municipality, then any such commission may, when determined by 20the Commissioners to be in the public interest and necessary 21for the protection of the public health or in the best interest 22of the Commission or its environs, enter into and perform 23contracts, whether long term or short term, with any such 24municipality, to acquire, construct and operate and maintain 25its waterworks properties within the corporate limits of such   SB1887- 30 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1municipality for the purpose of supplying water for public and 2domestic use to the inhabitants thereof.3    Such commission shall have the power to contract with any 4person, corporation or political subdivision or any municipal 5corporation or other agency for a supply of water, or to supply 6water to such person, corporation, municipal corporation or 7political subdivision. Any such contract made by a commission 8for a supply of water may contain provisions whereby the 9commission is obligated to pay for such supply of water 10without setoff or counterclaim and irrespective of whether 11such supply of water is ever furnished, made available or 12delivered to the commission or whether any project for the 13supply of water contemplated by any such contract is 14completed, operable or operating and notwithstanding any 15suspension, interruption, interference, reduction or 16curtailment of the supply of water from such project. Any such 17contract may provide that if one or more of the other 18purchasers defaults in the payment of its obligations under 19such contract or similar contract made with the supplier of 20the water, one or more of the remaining purchasers party to 21such contract or such similar contract shall be required to 22pay for all or a portion of the obligations of the defaulting 23purchasers. Any such contract entered into to supply water to 24a municipal corporation or political subdivision shall provide 25that the payments to be made thereunder shall be solely from 26the revenues to be derived by such municipality or political   SB1887- 31 -LRB104 07722 RTM 17767 b1subdivision from the operation of the waterworks system of 2such municipality or political subdivision, and said contract 3shall be a continuing, valid and binding obligation of the 4municipality or political subdivision, payable from such 5revenues for such period of years, not to exceed 40, as may be 6provided in such contract. Any such contract shall not be a 7debt within the meaning of any statutory or constitutional 8limitations.9    No prior appropriation shall be required before entering 10into such contract, and no appropriation shall be required to 11authorize payments to be made under the terms of any such 12contract, notwithstanding any provision of this Code to the 13contrary.14    The changes in this Section made by this amendatory Act of 151984 are intended to be declarative of existing law.16(Source: P.A. 83-1123.)